Hawaii statutes.
§352-4 Rules and regulations. The
director may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. The rules and regulations shall be approved by the governor but shall
not be subject to chapter 91 or require publication in order to be valid and
binding upon all committed persons and officers and employees of such
facilities. The rules shall be printed from time to time. [L 1980, c 303, pt
of §8(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next